402 . CHAPTER 15
A MONUMENT TO THE “LOST CAUSE”
This monument in the town square of Monroe, Georgia, was typical of many such memorials erected all across the South after the Civil War. They served both to commemorate the Confederate dead and to remind white Southerners of what was by the 1870s already widely known and romanticized as the "Lost Cause.” (© Lee Snider/Photo Images/Corbis) could advance successfully in American society. But whatever their particular demands, virtually all former slaves were united in their desire for independence from white control. Freed from slavery, blacks throughout the South began almost immediately to create autonomous African American communities. They pulled out of white-controlled churches and established their own. They created fraternal, benevolent, and mutual-aid societies. When they could, they began their own schools.
For most white Southerners, freedom meant something very different. It meant the ability to control their own destinies without interference from the North or the federal government. And in the immediate aftermath of the war, they attempted to exercise this version of freedom by trying to restore their society to its antebellum form. Slavery had been abolished in the former Confederacy by the Emancipation Proclamation, and everywhere else (as of December 1865) by
A FREEDMEN’S BUREAU SCHOOL
African American students and teachers stand outside a school for former slaves, one of many run by the Freedmen’s Bureau throughout the defeated Confederacy in the first years after the war. (© Corbis) the Thirteenth Amendment. But many white planters continued a kind of slavery in an altered form by keeping black workers legally tied to the plantations. When many white Southerners fought for what they considered freedom, they were fighting above all to preserve local and regional autonomy and white supremacy.
The federal government kept troops in the South after the war to preserve order and protect the freedmen. In March 1865, Congress established the Freedmen’s Bureau, an agency of the army directed by General Oliver O. Howard. The Freedmen’s Bureau distributed food to millions of former slaves. It established schools staffed by missionaries and teachers who had been sent to the South by Freedmen’s
Aid Societies and other private and church groups in the North. It made modest efforts to settle blacks on lands of their own. (The bureau also offered considerable assistance to poor whites, many of whom were similarly destitute and homeless after the war.) But the Freedmen’s Bureau was not a permanent solution. It had authority to operate for only one year; and in any case it was far too small to deal effectively with the enormous problems facing Southern society. By the time the war ended, other proposals for reconstructing the defeated South were emerging.
The
Freedmen’s
Bureau
Issues of Reconstruction
Reconstruction was determined not just by social realities or ideals. It was also determined by partisan politics. The terms by which the Southern states rejoined the Union had important implications for both major political parties. The Republican victories in 1860 and 1864 had been a result in large part of the division of the Democratic Party and, later, the removal of the South from the electorate. Readmitting the South, leaders of both parties believed, would reunite the Democrats and weaken the Republicans. In addition, the Republican Party had taken advantage of the South’s absence from Congress to pass a program of nationalistic economic legislation-railroad subsidies, protective tariffs, banking and currency reforms, and other measures to benefit Northern business leaders and industrialists. Should the Democratic
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH * 403
Party regain power with heavy Southern support, these programs would be in jeopardy. Complicating these practical questions were emotional concerns. Many Northerners believed the South should be punished in some way for the suffering and sacrifice its rebellion had caused. Many Northerners believed, too, that the South should be transformed, made over in the North’s urbanized image-its supposedly backward, feudal, undemocratic society civilized and modernized.
Even among the Republicans in Congress, there was considerable disagreement about the proper approach to Reconstruction disagreement that reflected the same fac-
Conservative tional divisions that had created disputes AND Radical over emancipation during the war. Republicans Conservatives insisted that the South accept the abolition of slavery, but proposed few other conditions for the readmission of the seceded states. The Radicals, led by Representative Thaddeus
Stevens of Pennsylvania and Senator Charles Sumner of Massachusetts, urged that the civil and military leaders of the Confederacy be punished, that large numbers of Southern whites be disenfranchised, that the legal rights of former slaves be protected, and that the property of wealthy white Southerners who had aided the Confederacy be confiscated and distributed among the freedmen. Some Radicals favored granting suffrage to the former slaves. Others hesitated, since few Northern states permitted blacks to vote. Between the Radicals and the Conservatives stood a faction of uncommitted Republicans, the Moderates, who rejected the punitive goals of the Radicals but supported extracting at least some concessions from the South on African American rights.
Plans for Reconstruction
President Lincoln’s sympathies lay with the Moderates and Conservatives of his party. He believed that a lenient Reconstruction policy would encourage Southern unionists and other former Whigs to join the Republican Party and would thus prevent the readmission of the South from strengthening the Democrats. More immediately, the Southern unionists could become the nucleus of new, loyal state governments in the South. Lincoln was not uninterested in the fate of the freedmen, but he was willing to defer questions about their future for the sake of rapid reunification.
Lincoln’s Reconstruction plan, which he announced in December 1863, offered a general amnesty to white Southerners other than high officials of the Confederacy-who would pledge loyalty to the gov-
Lincoln’s 10% ernment and accept the elimination of PtAN	slavery. Whenever 10 percent of the
number of voters in I860 took the
°ath in any state, those loyal voters could set up a state government. Lincoln also hoped to extend su rage to African Americans who were educated, owned prope y,
Wade-Davis
Bill
and had served in the Union army. Three Southern states-Louisiana, Arkansas, and Tennessee, all under Union occupation-reestablished loyal governments under the Lincoln formula in 1864.
The Radical Republicans were astonished at the mildness of Lincoln’s program. They persuaded Congress to deny seats to representatives from the three ’’reconstructed” states and refused to count the electoral vote of those states in the election of 1864. But for the moment, the Radicals were uncertain about what form their own Reconstruction plan should take. Their first effort to resolve that question was the Wade-Davis Bill, passed by Congress in July 1864. It authorized the
president to appoint a provisional governor for each conquered state. When a majority (not Lincoln’s 10 percent) of the white males of the state pledged their allegiance to the Union, the governor could summon a state constitutional convention, whose delegates were to be elected by those who would swear (through the so-called Ironclad Oath) that they had never borne arms against the United States-another departure from Lincoln’s plan. The new state constitutions would have to abolish slavery, disenfranchise Confederate civil and military leaders, and repudiate debts accumulated by the state governments during the war. After a state had met these conditions, Congress would readmit it to the Union. Like the president’s proposal, the Wade-Davis Bill left up to the states the question of political rights for blacks. Congress passed the bill a few days before it adjourned in 1864, and Lincoln disposed of it with a pocket veto. His action enraged the Radical leaders, and the pragmatic Lincoln became convinced he would have to accept at least some of the Radical demands. He began to move toward a new approach to Reconstruction.
The Death of Lincoln
What plan Lincoln might have produced no one can say. On the night of April 14, 1865, the president and his wife attended a play at Ford’s Theater in Washington. As they sat in the presidential box, John Wilkes Booth, a member of a distinguished family of actors and a zealous advocate of the Southern cause, entered the box from the rear and shot Lincoln in the head. The president was carried unconscious to a house across the street, where early the next morning, surrounded by family, friends, and political associates (among them a tearful Charles Sumner), he died.
The circumstances of Lincoln’s death earned him immediate martyrdom. It also produced something close to hysteria throughout the North. There were accusations that Booth had acted as part of a great conspiracy-accusations that contained some truth. Booth did indeed have associates, one of whom stabbed and wounded Secretary of State Seward the night of the assassination, another of whom abandoned at the last moment a plan to murder Vice President Johnson. Booth himself escaped on horseback into the Virginia countryside, where, on April 26, he was cornered by Union troops and shot to
ABRAHAM LINCOLN
This haunting photograph of Abraham Lincoln, showing clearly the weariness and aging that four years as a war president had created, was taken in Washington only four days before his assassination in 1865. (The Library of Congress) death in a blazing bam. A military tribunal convicted eight other people of participating in the conspiracy (at least two of them on the basis of virtually no evidence). Four were hanged.
To many Northerners, however, the murder of the president seemed evidence of an even greater conspiracy-one masterminded and directed by the unrepentant leaders of the defeated South. Militant Republicans exploited such suspicions relentlessly for months, ensuring that Lincoln’s death would help doom his plans for a relatively easy peace.
Johnson and "Restoration"
Leadership of the Moderates and Conservatives fell to Lincoln’s successor, Andrew Johnson, who was not well suited, by either circumstance or personality, for the task. A Democrat until he had joined the Union ticket with Lincoln in 1864, he became Andrew a RePu^^ican president at a moment when Johnson’s partisan passions were growing. Johnson Personality himself was an intemperate and tactless man, filled with resentments and insecurities. He was also openly hostile to the freed slaves and unwilling to support any plans that guaranteed them civil equality or enfranchisement. He once declared, "White men alone must manage the South.”
Johnson revealed his plan for Reconstruction-or Restoration,” as he preferred to call it-soon after he took
office, and he implemented it during the summer of 1865, when Congress was in recess. Like Lincoln, he offered amnesty to those Southerners who would take an oath of allegiance. (High-ranking Confederate officials and any white Southerner with land worth $20,000 or more would have to apply to the president for individual pardons. Johnson, a self-made man, apparently liked the thought of the great planter aristocrats humbling themselves before him.) In most other respects, however, his plan resembled that of the Wade-Davis Bill. For each state, the president appointed a provisional governor, who was to invite qualified voters to elect delegates to a constitutional convention. Johnson did not specify how many qualified voters were necessary, but he implied that he would require a majority (as had the Wade-Davis Bill). In order to win readmission to Congress, a state had to revoke its ordinance of secession, abolish slavery, ratify the Thirteenth Amendment, and repudiate the Confederate and state war debts. The final procedure before restoration was for a state to elect a state government and send representatives to Congress.
Whereas Johnson helped white southerners to return to their land, he did little in support of the former slaves. Although freedmen had been given their liberty, holding on to it proved difficult. Many freedmen who returned to work for white planters found themselves almost like slaves again. Johnson offered no help. "Are not our rights as a free people and good citizens of the United States to be considered?” asked a petition against the president. It was a long time before freedmen truly found liberty.
By the end of 1865, all the seceded states had formed new governments-some under Lincoln’s plan, some under Johnson’s-and were prepared to rejoin the Union as soon as
Northern Congress recognized them. But Radical
Attitudes Republicans vowed not to recognize the Harden Johnson governments, just as they had previously refused to recognize the Lincoln regimes; for by now, Northern opinion had hardened and become more hostile toward the South than it had been a year earlier when Congress passed the Wade-Davis Bill. Many Northerners were disturbed by the apparent reluctance of some delegates to the Southern conventions to abolish slavery, and by the refusal of all the conventions to grant suffrage to any blacks. They were astounded that states claiming to be "loyal” should elect prominent leaders of the recent Confederacy as state officials and representatives to Congress. Particularly hard to accept was Georgia’s choice of Alexander H. Stephens, former Confederate vice president, as a United
States senator.
RADICAL RECONSTRUCTION
Reconstruction under Johnson’s plan—often known as "presf dential Reconstruction”-continued only until Congress reconvened in December 1865. At that point, Congress refused to seat the representatives of the "restored” states and created a
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
• 405 new Joint Committee on Reconstruction to frame a Reconstruction policy of its own. The period of "congressional,” or "Radical,” Reconstruction had begun.
The Black Codes
Meanwhile, events in the South were driving Northern opinion in more-radical directions. Throughout the South in 1865 and early 1866, state legislatures were enacting sets of laws known as the "Black Codes,” designed to give whites substantial control over former slaves. The codes authorized local officials to apprehend unemployed African Americans, fine them for vagrancy, and hire them out to private employers to satisfy the fine. Some of the codes forbade blacks to own or lease farms or to take any jobs other than as plantation workers or domestic servants.
Congress first responded to the Black Codes by passing an act extending the life of the Freedmen’s Bureau and widening its powers so that it could nullify work agreements forced on
_	, freedmen under the Black Codes. Then, in
Johnson s	.	l q
Vetoes April 1866, Congress passed the first Civil Rights Act, which declared African
Americans to be citizens of the United States and gave the federal government power to intervene in state affairs to protect the rights of citizens. Johnson vetoed both bills, but Congress overrode him on each of them.
The Fourteenth Amendment
In April 1866, the Joint Committee on Reconstruction proposed a new amendment to the Constitution, which Congress approved in early summer and sent to the states for ratification. Eventually, it became one of the most important provisions in the Constitution.
The Fourteenth Amendment offered the first constitutional definition of American citizenship: everyone born in the United States, and everyone naturalized, was automatically a citizen and entitled to all the "privileges and immunities” guaranteed by the Constitution, including equal protection of the laws by c	both the state and national governments.
FORBwcis There C0Uld be n° °ther reClUirementS (f°r example, being white) for citizenship. The amendment also imposed penalties-reduction of representation in Congress and in the electoral college-on states that denied suffrage to any adult male inhabitants. (The wording reflected the prevailing view in Congress and elsewhere that the fran chise was properly restricted to men.) Finally, it prohibited for mer members of Congress or other former federal officials who
had aided the Confederacy from holding any state or federal o fice unless two-thirds of Congress voted to pardon them.
Congressional Radicals offered to readmit to the Union any state whose legislature ratified the Fourteenth Amendment. Only Tennessee did so. All the other former Confederate states, along with Delaware and Kentucky, refused, leaving t e amendment temporarily without the necessary approva three-fourths of the states.
FOURTEENTH AMENDMENT
Among its provisions, the Fourteenth Amendment provided the first constitutional definition of U.S. citizenship. Everyone born in the United States, and everyone naturalized, was automatically a citizen and entitled to all the "privileges and immunities" guaranteed by the Constitution, including equal protection of the laws by both the state and national governments. This amendment also imposed penalties on states that did not extend the right to vote to all male citizens, including African American men. African American women, like all women, had to wait until 1920 and the ratification of the Nineteenth Amendment before legally entitled to vote. (© North Wind Picture Archives/Alamy) But by now, the Radicals were growing more confident and determined. Bloody race riots in New Orleans and other Southern cities-riots in which African Americans were the principal victims-were among the events that strengthened their hand. In the 1866 congressional elections, Johnson actively campaigned for Conservative candidates, but he did his own cause more harm than good with his intemperate speeches. The voters returned an overwhelming majority of Republicans, most of them Radicals, to Congress. In the Senate, there were now 42 Republicans to 11 Democrats; in the House, 143 Republicans to 49 Democrats. (The South remained largely unrepresented in both chambers.) Congressional Republicans were now strong enough to enact a plan of their own even over the president’s objections.
The Congressional Plan
The Radicals passed three Reconstruction bills early in 1867 and overrode Johnson’s vetoes of all of them. These bills
406 ♦ CHAPTER 15
i
ii
Three
Reconstruction
Bills
i
i
finally established, nearly two years after the end of the war, a coherent plan for Reconstruction.
Under the congressional plan, Tennessee,
which had ratified the Fourteenth Amendment, was promptly readmitted. But Congress rejected the Lincoln-Johnson governments of the other ten Confederate states and, instead, combined those states into five military districts. A military commander governed each district and had orders to register qualified voters (defined as all adult black males and those white males who had not participated in the rebellion). Once registered, voters would elect conventions to prepare new state constitutions, which had to include provisions for black suffrage. Once voters ratified the new constitutions, they could elect state governments. Congress had to approve a state's constitution, and the state legislature had to ratify the Fourteenth Amendment. Once that happened, and once enough states ratified the amendment to make it part of the Constitution, then the former Confederate states could be restored to the Union.
By 1868, seven of the ten former Confederate states (Arkansas, North Carolina, South Carolina, Louisiana, Alabama, Georgia, and
Florida) had fulfilled these conditions (including ratification of the Fourteenth Amendment, which now became part of the Constitution). They were readmitted to the Union. Conservative whites held up the return of Virginia and Texas until 1869 and Mississippi until 1870. By then, Congress had added one more
Fifteenth	requirement for readmission-ratification of
Amendment	another constitutional amendment, the
Fifteenth, which forbade the states and the federal government to deny suffrage to any citizen on account
of "race, color, or previous condition of servitude.”
To stop the president from interfering with their plans, the congressional Radicals passed two remarkable laws of dubious constitutionality in 1867. One, the Tenure of Office Act, forbade the president to remove civil officials, including members of his own cabinet, without the consent of the Senate. The principal purpose of the law was to protect the job of Secretary of War Edwin M. Stanton, who was cooperating with the Radicals. The other law, the Command of the Army Act, prohibited the president from issuing military orders except through the commanding general of the army (General Grant), who could not be relieved or assigned elsewhere without the consent of the Senate.
manag°edN,7retuUrn ^i°cNai ^owtr ^0X^,0,Southeys	“ WS" “ *
What had to happen for a state to be readnutted to the Mon? Who, had to happen before a state could experience Option"?
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
• 407 The congressional Radicals also took action to stop the Supreme Court from interfering with their plans. In 1866, the Court had declared in the case of Ex parte Milligan that military tribunals were unconstitutional in places where civil courts were functioning, a decision that seemed to threaten the system of military government the Radicals were planning for the South. Radicals in Congress immediately proposed several bills that would require two-thirds of the justices to support any decision overruling a law of Congress, would deny the Court jurisdiction in Reconstruction cases, would reduce its membership to three, and would even abolish it. The justices apparently took notice. Over the next two years, the Court refused to accept jurisdiction in any cases involving Reconstruction (and the congressional bills concerning the Court never passed).
The Impeachment of the President
President Johnson had long since ceased to be a serious obstacle to the passage of Radical legislation, but he was still the official charged with administering the Reconstruction programs. As such, the Radicals believed, he remained a serious impediment to their plans. Early in 1867, they began looking for a way to impeach him and remove him from office. Republicans found grounds for impeachment, they believed, when Johnson dismissed Secretary of War Stanton despite Congress’s refusal to agree, thus deliberately violating
T	the Tenure of Office Act in hopes of test-
Office Act big ^aw before the courts. Elated Radicals in the House quickly impeached the president and sent the case to the Senate for trial. By that time, the Radicals were determined to impeach President Johnson. "Who does not know,” said Benjamin Butler, an opponent of Johnson, "that from the hour [Johnson] began these, his usurpations of power, he everywhere denounced Congress, the legality and constitutionality of its action, and
defied its legitimate power.”
The trial before the Senate lasted throughout April and May 1868. The Radicals put heavy pressure on all the Republican senators, but the Moderates (who were losing kith in the Radical program) vacillated. On the first
Johnson three charges to come to a vote, seven
Acquitted Republicans joined the Democrats and independents to support acquittal. The vote was 35 to 19, one short of the constitutionally required two-thirds majority. After that, the Radicals dropped the
impeachment effort.
the south in
Reconstruction
When white Southerners spoke bitterly in later years of the effects of Reconstruction, they referred most frequently to the governments Congress helped impose on them
governments they claimed were both incompetent and corrupt, that saddled the region with enormous debts, and that trampled on the rights of citizens. When black Southerners and their defenders condemned Reconstruction, in contrast, they spoke of the failure of the national and state governments to go far enough to guarantee freedmen even the most elemental rights of citizenship-a failure that resulted in a harsh new system of economic subordination. (See "Debating the Past,” pp. 416-417.)
The Reconstruction Governments
In the ten states of the South that were reorganized under the congressional plan, approximately one-fourth of the white males were at first excluded from voting or holding office. That produced black majorities among voters in South Carolina, Mississippi, and Louisiana (states where blacks were also a majority of the population), and in Alabama and Florida (where they were not). But the government soon lifted most suffrage restrictions so that nearly all white males could vote. After that, Republicans maintained control only with the support of many Southern whites.
Critics called these Southern white Republicans "scalawags.” Many were former Whigs who had never felt comfortable
THE BURDENED SOUTH
This Reconstruction-era cartoon expresses the South's sense of its oppression at the hands of Northern Republicans. President Grant (whose hat bears Abraham Lincoln's initials) rides in comfort in a giant carpetbag, guarded by bayonet-wielding soldiers, as the South staggers under the burden in chains. More evidence of destruction and military occupation is visible in the background. (© The Granger Collection, New York) 408 * CHAPTER 15
in the Democratic Party—some of them wealthy (or once wealthy) planters or businessmen interested in the economic
"Scalawags” development of the region. Others were farmers who lived in remote areas where there had been little or no slavery and who hoped the Republican program of internal improvements would help end their economic isolation. Despite their diverse social positions, scalawags shared a belief that the Republican Party would
serve their economic interests better than the Democrats. White men from the North also served as Republican lead-
ers in the South. Critics of Reconstruction referred to them "Carpetbaggers” Pejoratively as "carpetbaggers,” which conveyed an image of penniless adventurers who arrived with all their possessions in a carpetbag (a common kind of cheap suitcase covered with carpeting material). In fact, most of the so-called carpetbaggers were well-educated people of middle-class origin, many of them doctors, lawyers, and teachers. Most were veterans of the
Union army who looked on the South as a new frontier, more promising than the West. They had settled there at war’s end as hopeful planters or as business and professional people.
But the most numerous Republicans in the South were the black freedmen, most of whom had no previous experi-Freedmen	ence in politics and who tried, there-
fore, to build institutions through which they could learn to exercise their power. In several states, African American voters held their own conventions to chart their future course. One such "colored convention,” as Southern whites called them, assembled in Alabama in 1867 and announced: "We claim exactly the same rights, privileges and immunities as are enjoyed by white men-we
NEW ORLEANS RIOT
On July 30, 1866, a violent conflict took place outside the Mechanics Institute in New Orleans. Whites attacked blacks parading outside the building whe a reconvened Louisiana Constitutional Convention was being held. The state's Radical Republicans had called for the Convention because they were angered by the legislature’s enactment of the Black Codes that restricted the rights of African Americans to travel and wc An estimated thirty-eight people were killed and forty-six wounded, most of them African American. (© The Granger Collection, New York)
ask nothing more and will be content with nothing else.” The black churches that freedmen created after emancipation also helped give unity and political self-confidence to the former slaves. African Americans played a significant role in the politics of the Reconstruction South. They served as delegates to the constitutional conventions. They held public offices of practically every kind. Between 1869 and 1901, twenty African Americans served in the U.S. House of Representatives, two in the Senate (Hiram Revels of Mississippi and Blanche K. Bruce of Mississippi). African Americans served, too, in state legislatures and in various other state offices. Southern whites complained loudly (both at the time and for generations to come) about "Negro rule” during Reconstruction, but no such thing ever actually existed in any of the states. No black man was ever elected governor of a Southern state (although Lieutenant Governor P. B. S. Pinchback briefly performed gubernatorial duties in Louisiana). African Americans never controlled any of the state legislatures, although they held a majority in the lower house in South Carolina for a short time. In the South as a whole, the percentage of black officeholders was always far lower than the percentage of blacks in the population.
The record of the Reconstruction governments is mixed. Critics at the time and since denounced them for corruption and financial extravagance, and there is some truth to both charges. Officeholders in many states enriched themselves through graft and other illicit activities. State budgets expanded to hitherto unknown totals, and state debts soared to previously undreamed-of heights. In South Carolina, for example, the public debt increased from $7 million to $29 million in eight years.
But the corruption in the South, real as it was, was hardly unique to the Reconstruction governments. Corruption was at least as rampant in the Northern states. And in both North and South, it was a result of the same thing: a rapid economic expansion of government services (and revenues) that put new strains on (and new temptations before) elected officials everywhere. The end of Reconstruction did not end corruption in Southern state governments. In many states, in fact, corruption increased.
And the state expenditures of the Reconstruction years were huge only in comparison with the meager budgets of the antebellum era. They represented an effort to provide the South with urgently needed services that antebellum governments had never offered: public education, public works programs, relief for the poor, and other costly new commitments. There were, to be sure, graft and extravagance in Reconstruction governments; there were also positive and permanent accomplishments.
Education
Perhaps the most important of those accomplishments was a dramatic improvement in the education of African Americans and white Southerners with scant learning. In the first years of Reconstruction, much of the impetus for educational reform in
J
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH - 409
the South came from outside groupsfrom the Freedmen’s Bureau, from Northern private philanthropic organizations, from many Northern women, black and white, who traveled to the South to teach in freedmen’s schools-and from black Southerners themselves. Over the opposition of many Southern whites, who feared that education would give African Americans "false notions of equality,” these reformers established a large network of schools for former slaves-4,000 schools by 1870, staffed by 9,000 teachers (half of them black), teaching 200,000 students (about 12 percent of the total school-age population of the freedmen). In the 1870s, Reconstruction governments also began to build a comprehensive public school system in the South. By 1876, more than half of all white children and about 40 percent of all black children were attending schools in the South. Several black "academies,” offering more advanced education, also began operating. Gradually, these academies grew into an important network of black colleges and universities, which included such distinguished schools as Fisk and Atlanta Universities and Morehouse College.
Already, however, Southern education was becoming divided into two separate systems, one black and one white. Segregated Early efforts to integrate the schools of the Schools	region were a dismal failure. The Freedmen’s
Bureau schools, for example, were open to students of all races, but almost no whites attended them. New Orleans set up an integrated school system under the Reconstruction government; again, whites almost universally stayed away. The one federal effort to mandate school integration-the Civil Rights Act of 1875-had its provisions for educational desegregation removed before it was passed. As soon as the Republican governments of Reconstruction were replaced, the new Southern Democratic regimes quickly aban-
doned all efforts to promote integration.
Landownership and Tenancy
The most ambitious goal of the Freedmen’s Bureau, and of some Radical Republicans in Congress, was to make Reconstruction the vehicle for a fundamental reform of
the SOUTHERN Pl ANTATION BEFORE AND AFTER EMANCIPATION This map shows the distribution of lands and dwellings on the Barrow Plantation in Oglethorpe County,
XL of the Civil War. The map on the lef, shows the plantation in ,861. as the war^^^“^Z^heT
Barrow Plantation was highly centralized before the war, with all slaves living together in a complex of dwellings near the masters ouse. weri y ye	,	P	9	independently.
Escape was very differently divided. Housing was now widely dispersed, as former slaves became tenants or sharecroppers and began working their own small pieces	and g p
Churches had sprung up away from the landowner’s house as well.	_ „	________________ __ --..................
• Why did former slaves move so quickly to relocate their homes and churches away from their former masters?
410 CHAPTER 15
landownership in the South. The effort failed. In the last years of the war and the first years of Reconstruction, the Freedmen's Bureau did oversee the redistribution of substantial amounts of land to freedmen in a few areas-notably the Sea Islands of South Carolina and Georgia, and areas of Mississippi that had
Failure of Land	once belonSed t0 the famlly °f
Redistribution	Jefferson Davis. By June 1865, the
bureau had settled nearly 10,000 black families on their own land-most of it drawn from abandoned plantations-arousing dreams among former slaves throughout the South of "forty acres and a mule.” By the end of that year, however, the experiment was already collapsing. Southern plantation owners were returning and demanding the restoration of their property, and President Johnson was supporting their demands. Despite the resistance of the Freedmen’s Bureau, the government eventually returned
most of the confiscated land to the original white owners.
Very few Northern Republicans believed that the federal government had the right to confiscate property. Even so, distribution of landownership in the South changed considerably in the postwar years. Among whites, there was a significant decline in landownership, from 80 percent before the war to 67 percent by the end of Reconstruction. Some whites lost their land because of unpaid debt or increased taxes; some left the marginal lands they had owned to move to more-fertile areas, where they rented.
During the same period, the number of African Americans who owned land rose from virtually none to more than 20 percent. Many black landowners acquired their property through hard work or luck or both. But some relied unwisely on assistance from white-dominated financial or philanthropic institutions. One of them was the Freedman's Bank, established in 1865 by antislavery whites in an effort to promote landownership among African Americans. They persuaded thousands of freedmen to deposit their modest savings in the bank, but then invested heavily in unsuccessful enterprises. It was ill prepared, therefore, for the national depression of the 1870s and it failed in 1874.
Still, most blacks, and a growing minority of whites, did not own their own land during Reconstruction; and some who acquired land in the 1860s had lost it by the 1890s. These Sharecropping PeoPle worked for others in one form or
another. Many African American agricultural laborers-perhaps 25 percent of the total-simply worked for wages. Most, however, became tenants of white landowners-working their own plots of land and paying their landlords either a fixed rent or a share of their crop (see p. 420).
The new system was a repudiation of former slaves of the gang-labor system of the antebellum plantation, in which slaves had lived and worked together under the direction of a master. As tenants and sharecroppers, African Americans enjoyed at least a physical independence from their landlords and had the sense of working their own land, even if in most cases they could never hope to buy it. But tenantry also benefited landlords in some ways, relieving them of any responsibility for the physical well-being of their workers.
The Crop-Lien System
In some respects, the postwar years were a period of remarkable economic progress for African Americans. If the material benefits they had received under slavery are calculated as income, then prewar blacks had earned about a 22 percent share of the profits of the plantation system. By the end of Reconstruction, they were earning 56 percent. Measured another way, the per capita income of Southern blacks rose 46 percent between 1857 and 1879, while the per capita income of Southern whites declined 35 percent. This represented one of the most significant redistributions of income in American history.
But these figures are somewhat misleading. While the black share of profits was increasing, the total profits of Southern agriculture were declining-a result of the dislocations
SHARECROPPERS, 1879 This painting, by Winslow Homer (1836-1910), depicts ecroppers picking cotton. In sharecropping, a landowner permits tenants to use the land in
exchange for a share of the crops produced. (^ The Granger Collection, New York)
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH * 411
of the war and a reduction in the world market for cotton. In addition, while African Americans were earning a greater return on each hour of labor than they had under slavery, they were working fewer hours. Women and children were less likely to labor in the fields than in the past. Adult men tended to work shorter days. In all, the black labor force worked about one-third fewer hours during Reconstruction than slaves had been compelled to work under slavery-a reduction that brought the working schedule of blacks roughly into line with that of white farm laborers. Nor did the income redistribution of the postwar years lift many African Americans out of poverty. Black per capita income rose from about one-quarter of white per capita income to about one-half in the first few years after the war. And after this initial increase, it rose hardly at all.
For blacks and poor whites alike, whatever gains there might have been as a result of land and income redistribution were often overshadowed by the ravages of the crop-lien system.
Few of the traditional institutions of credit in the South-the "factors” and banks-returned after the war. In their stead
New System emerged a new system of credit, centered of Credit iR lar£e Part °n local country stores, some of them owned by planters, others by independent merchants. Blacks and whites, landowners and tenants-all depended on these stores for such necessities as food, clothing, seed, and farm implements. And since farmers did not have the same steady cash flow as other workers, customers usually had to rely on credit from these merchants in order to purchase what they needed. Most local stores had no competition (and went to great lengt hs to ensure that things stayed that way). As a result, they were able to set interest rates as high as 50 or 60 percent. Farmers had to give the merchants a lien (or claim) on their crops as collateral for the loans (thus the term "crop-lien system”). Farmers who suffered a few bad years in a row, as often happened, could become trapped
in a cycle of debt from which they could never escape.
WASH DAY ON THE PLANTATION
One of the most common occupations of women recently emancipated from slavery was taking in laundry from white families who no longer had slaves household servants. This photograph of a group of African American women illustrates how arduous a task laundry was. (The L.brary o ongress 412 < CHAPTER 15
This burdensome credit system had a number of effects on the region, almost all of them unhealthy. One effect was that some former slaves who had acquired land during the early years of Reconstruction gradually lost it as they fell into debt. So, to a lesser extent, did white small landowners. Another effect was that Southern farmers became almost wholly dependent on cash crops-and most of all on cotton-because only such marketable commodities seemed to offer any possibility of escape from debt. Thus Southern agriculture, never sufficiently diversified even in the best of times, became more one-dimensional than ever. The relentless planting of cotton, moreover, was contributing to an exhaustion of the soil. The crop-lien system, in other words, was not only helping to impoverish small farmers; it was also contributing to a general decline in the Southern agricultural economy.
The African American Family in Freedom
One of the most striking features of the black response to Reconstruction was the effort to build or rebuild family structures and to protect them from the interference they had experienced under slavery. A major reason for the rapid departure of so many emancipated slaves from plantations was the desire to find lost relatives and reunite families. Thousands of African Americans wandered through the South-often over vast distances-looking for husbands, wives, children, or other relatives from whom they had been separated. In the few black newspapers that circulated in the South, there were many advertisements by people searching for information about their relatives. Former slaves rushed to have marriages, previously without legal standing, sanctified by church and law. Black families resisted living in the former slave quarters and moved instead to small cabins scattered widely across the countryside, where they could enjoy at least some privacy. Within the black family, the definition of male and female roles quickly came to resemble that within white families. Many women and children ceased working in the fields. Such work, they believed, was a badge of slavery. Instead, many women restricted themselves largely to domestic tasks-cooking, cleaning, gardening, sewing, raising children, attending to the needs of their husbands. Some black husbands refused to allow their wives to work as servants in white homes. "When I married my wife I married her to wait on me,” one freedman told a former master who was attempting to hire his wife as a servant. "She got all she can do right here for me and the children/'
Still, middle-class notions of domesticity were often difficult to sustain in the impoverished circumstances of most
Changing former slaves. Economic necessity required Gender Roles many black women to engage in income-producing activities, including activities that they and their husbands resisted: working as domestic servants, taking in laundry, or helping in the field. By the end of Reconstruction, half of all black women over the age of sixteen were working for wages. And unlike white working
women, most black female income-earners were married.
THE GRANT ADMINISTRATION
Exhausted by the political turmoil of the Johnson administration, American voters in 1868 yearned for a strong, stable figure to
They turned trustingly to General Ulysses S. Grant, the hero of the war and, by 1868, a revered national idol.
The Soldier President
Grant could have had the nomination of either party in 1868. But believing that Republican Reconstruction policies were
U S
Grant more P°Pular in the North> he accepted the Republican nomination. The Democrats nominated former governor Horatio Seymour of New York. The campaign was a bitter one, and Grant’s triumph was surprisingly narrow. Without the 500,000 new black Republican voters in the South, he would have had a minority of the pop- ular vote.
Grant entered the White House with no political experience, and his performance was clumsy and ineffectual from the start. Except for Hamilton Fish, whom Grant appointed secretary of state and who served for eight years with great distinction, most members of the cabinet were ill equipped for their tasks. Grant relied chiefly, and increasingly, on established party leaders-the group most ardently devoted to patronage. His administration used the spoils system even more blatantly than most of its predecessors, embittering reform-minded members of his party. Grant also alienated the many Northerners who were growing disillusioned with Radical Reconstruction policies, which the president continued to support. Some Republicans suspected, correctly, that there was also corruption in the Grant administration itself.
By the end of Grant’s first term, therefore, members of a substantial faction of the party-who referred to themselves as Liberal Liberal Republicans-had come to oppose
Republicans what they called "Grantism.” In 1872, hoping to prevent Grant’s reelection, they bolted the party and nominated their own presidential candidate: Horace Greeley, veteran editor and publisher of the New York Tribune. The Democrats, somewhat reluctantly, named Greeley their candidate as well, hoping that the alliance with the Liberals would enable them to defeat Grant. But the effort was in vain. Grant won a substantial victory, polling 286 electoral votes to Greeley’s 66, and nearly 56 percent of the pop-
ular total.
The Grant Scandals
During the 1872 campaign, the first of a series of political scandals came to light that would plague Grant and the
Credit	Republicans for years. It involved the
Mobilier	Credit Mobilier construction company,
which had helped build the Union Pacific
Railroad. The heads of Credit Mobilier had used their positions
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
• 413 CREDIT MOBILIER
This political cartoon by Thomas Nast, called "The Cherubs of Credit Mobilier," depicts the censure by the House of Representatives of Congressmen James Brooks of New York and Oakes Ames of Massachusetts for their involvement in the Credit Mobilier scandal, one of several scandals to stain the Grant administration. (© The Granger Collection, New York) as Union Pacific stockholders to steer large fraudulent contracts to their construction company, thus bilking the Union Pacific (and the federal government, which provided large subsidies to the railroad) of millions. To prevent investigations, the directors had given Credit Mobilier stock to key members of Congress. In 1872, Congress launched an investigation, which revealed that some highly placed Republicans-including Schuyler Colfax, now Grant’s vice president-had accepted some of the stock.
One dreary episode followed another in Grant’s second term. Benjamin H. Bristow, Grant’s third Treasury secretary, discovered that some of his officials and a group of distillers operating as a ’’whiskey ring” were cheating the government out of taxes by filing false reports. Then a House investigation revealed that William W. Belknap, secretary of war, had accepted bribes to retain an Indian-post trader in office (the so-called Indian ring). Other, lesser scandals added to the growing impression that ’’Grantism” had brought rampant corruption to government.
The Greenback Question
Compounding Grant’s, and the nation’s, problems was a financial crisis, known as the Panic of 1873. It began with the Panic of 1873 failure of a leading investment banking firm, Jay Cooke and Company, which had invested too heavily in postwar railroad building. There had been panics before-in 1819, 1837, and 1857-but this was worse than any earlier economic crisis. The depression it pro-
duced lasted four years.
Debtors now pressured the government to redeem federal War bonds with greenbacks, paper currency of the sort printed during the Civil War, which would increase the amount of
money in circulation. But Grant and most Republicans wanted a ’’sound” currency-based solidly on gold reserves-which would favor the interests of banks and other creditors. Approximately $356 million in paper currency issued during the Civil War was still in circulation. In 1873, the Treasury issued more in response to the panic. But in 1875, Republican leaders in Congress, in an effort to crush the greenback movement for good, passed the Specie Resumption Act. It provided that after January 1, 1879, the greenback dollars, whose value constantly fluctuated, would be redeemed by the government and replaced with new certificates, firmly pegged to the price of gold. The law satisfied creditors, who had worried that debts would be repaid in paper currency of uncertain value. But ’’resumption” made things more difficult for debtors, because the gold-based money supply could not easily expand.
In 1875, the ’’greenbackers,” as the inflationists were called, formed their own political organization: the National Greenback Party. It was active in the next three presidential elections, but it failed to gain widespread support. It did, however, keep the money issue alive. The question of the proper composition of the currency was to remain
one of the most controversial and enduring issues in late-nine-teenth-century American politics.
National
Greenback
Party
Republican Diplomacy
The Johnson and Grant administrations achieved their greatest successes in foreign affairs. The accomplishments were the work not of the presidents themselves, who displayed little aptitude for diplomacy, but of two outstanding secretaries of state: William H. Seward, who had served Lincoln and who remained in office until 1869; and Hamilton Fish, who served throughout the two terms of the Grant administration.
An ardent expansionist, Seward acted with as much daring as the demands of Reconstruction politics and the Republican
"Seward’s hatred of President Johnson would permit. Folly”	Seward accepted a Russian offer to sell
Alaska to the United States for $7.2 million, despite criticism from many Americans who considered Alaska a frozen wasteland and derided it as ’’Seward’s Folly.” In 1867, Seward also engineered the American annexation of the tiny Midway Islands, west of Hawaii.
Hamilton Fish’s first major challenge was resolving the long-standing controversy with England over the American claims that the British government had violated neutrality laws during the Civil War by permitting English shipyards to
Alabama build ships (among them the Alabama) for Claims	the Confederacy. American demands that
England pay for the damage these vessels had caused became known as the ”Alabama claims.” In 1871, after a number of failed efforts, Fish forged an agreement, the Treaty of Washington, which provided for international arbitration and in which Britain expressed regret for the ’’escape” of the Alabama from England.
THE ABANDONMENT
OF RECONSTRUCTION
As the North grew increasingly preoccupied with its own political and economic problems, interest in Reconstruction began to wane. The Grant administration continued to protect Republican governments in the South, but less because of any interest in ensuring the position of freedmen than because of a desire to prevent the reemergence of a strong Democratic Party in the region. But even the presence of federal troops was not enough to prevent white Southerners from overturning the Reconstruction regimes. By the time Grant left office, Democrats had taken back (or, as white Southerners called it, "redeemed”) the governments of seven of the eleven former Confederate states. For three other states-South Carolina, Louisiana, and Florida-the end of Reconstruction had to wait for the withdrawal of the last federal troops in 1876, a withdrawal that was the result of a long process of political bargaining and compromise at the national level. (One former Confederate state, Tennessee, had never been part of the Reconstruction process because it had ratified the Fourteenth Amendment and rejoined the Union in 1866.)
The Southern States "Redeemed"
In the states where whites constituted a majority-the states of the upper South-overthrowing Republican control was relatively simple. By 1872, all but a handful of Southern whites had regained suffrage. Now a clear majority of the electorate, they needed only to organize and vote for their candidates.
In other states, where African Americans were a majority or the black and white populations were almost equal, whites used intimidation and violence to undermine the Reconstruction regimes. Secret societies-the Ku Klux Kian, the Knights of the White Camellia, and others-used terrorism to frighten or physically bar blacks from voting or otherwise exercising citizenship. Paramilitary organizations-the Red Shirts and White Leagues-armed themselves to "police” elections and worked to force all white males to join the Democratic Party and to exclude all African Americans from meaningful political activity.
The Ku Klux Kian was the largest and most effective of these organizations. Formed in 1866 and led by former Ku Klux Klan Confederate general Nathan Bedford Forrest, it gradually absorbed many of the smaller terrorist organizations in the South. Its leaders devised rituals, costumes, secret languages, and other airs of mystery to create a bond among its members and make the organization seem even more terrifying to those it was attempting to intimidate. The Kian’s "midnight rides”-bands of men clad in white sheets and masks, their horses covered with white robes and with hooves muffled-created terror in black communities
throughout the South.
Many white Southerners considered the Kian and the other secret societies and paramilitary groups proud, patriotic societies. Together such groups served, in effect, as a military
force (even if a decentralized and poorly organized one) continuing the battle against Northern rule. They worked in particular to advance the interests of those with the most to gain from a restoration of white supremacy-above all the planter class and the Southern Democratic Party. Even stronger than the Kian in discouraging black political power, however, was the simple weapon of economic pressure: some planters refused to rent land to Republican blacks; storekeepers refused to extend them credit; employers refused to give them work.
The Ku Klux Klan Acts
The Republican Congress tried for a time to turn back this new wave of white repression. In 1870 and 1871, it passed „	two Enforcement Acts, also known as the
Acts	Ku k1ux Klan Acts’ whlch were in manY
ways the most radical measures of the era.
The Enforcement Acts prohibited the states from discriminating against voters on the basis of race and gave the federal government power to supersede the state courts and prosecute violations of the law. It was the first time the federal government had ever claimed the power to prosecute crimes by individuals under federal law. Federal district attorneys were now empowered to take action against conspiracies to deny African Americans such rights as voting, holding office, and serving on juries. The new laws also authorized the president to use the military to protect civil rights and to suspend the right of habeas corpus when violations of the rights seemed particularly egregious. In October 1871, President Grant used this provision of the law when he declared a "state of lawlessness” in nine counties in South Carolina and sent in federal troops to occupy the area. Hundreds of suspected Klan members were arrested; some were held for long periods without trial; some were eventually convicted under the law and sent to jail.
The Enforcement Acts were seldom used as severely as they
Decline of were in South Carolina, but they were ef-the Klan fective in the effort by blacks and Northern whites to weaken the Klan. By 1872, Klan violence against blacks was in decline throughout the region.
Waning Northern Commitment
The Ku Klux Klan Acts marked the peak of Republican commitment to enforce the new rights Reconstruction was extending to black citizens. But that commitment did not last for long. Southern blacks were gradually losing the support of many of their former backers in the North. As early as 1870, after the adoption of the Fifteenth Amendment, some northern reformers convinced themselves that their long campaign on behalf of black people was now over -that with the vote, African Americans ought to be able to take care of themselves. Over the next several years, former Radical leaders such as Charles Sumner and Horace Greeley now began calling themselves Liberals, cooperating with Democrats and, at times,
4
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
• 415 outdoing even the Democrats in denouncing what they viewed as black and carpetbag misgovernment. Within the South itself, many white Republicans joined the Liberals and eventually moved into the Democratic Party.
The Panic of 1873 further undermined support for Reconstruction. The economic crisis spurred Northern industrialists and their allies to find an explanation for the poverty and instability around them. They found it in a new idea known as "Social Darwinism” (see p. 471), a harsh theory that argued that individuals who failed did so because of their
.	™ own weakness and "unfitness.” Those influ-
Impact of
Social	encea by Social Darwinism came to view
Darwinism the large number of unemployed vagrants in the North-and poor African Americans in the South-as irredeemable misfits. Social Darwinism also encouraged a broad critique of government intervention in social and economic life, which further weakened commitment to the Reconstruction program. Support for land redistribution, never great, and willingness to spend money from the depleted federal treasury to aid the freedmen, waned quickly after 1873. State and local governments also found themselves short of funds, and rushed to cut back on social services-which in the South meant the end of almost all
services to the former slaves.
In the congressional elections of 1874, the Democrats won control of the House of Representatives for the first time since 1861. Grant took note of the changing temper of the North and made use of military force to prop up the Republican regimes that were still standing in the South. By the end of 1876, only three southern states were left in the hands of the Republicans-South Carolina, Louisiana, and Florida. In state elections that year, Democrats (after using terrorist tactics) claimed victory in all three. But the Republicans challenged the results and claimed victory as well, and they were able to remain in office because of the presence of federal troops. Without federal troops, it was now clear, the last of the Republican regimes would quickly fall.
The Compromise of 1877
Grant had hoped to run for another term in 1876. But most Republican leaders were shaken by recent Democrat success, afraid of the scandals with which Grant was associated, and Hayes versus concerned about the president’s declining
Tilden	health. Instead, they sought a candidate
not associated with the problems of the
Grant years, one who might entice Liberals and unite the party again. They settled on Rutherford B. Hayes of Ohio, a former Union army officer, governor, and congressman, champion of civil service reform. The Democrats united behind Samuel J. Tilden, the reform governor of New York who had been instrumental in challenging the corrupt Tweed Ring of New York Gity’s Tammany Hall.
Although the campaign was a bitter one, there were few differences of principle between the candidates, both of whom were conservatives committed to moderate reform. The
November election produced an apparent Democratic victory. Tilden carried the South and several large Northern states, and his popular margin over Hayes was nearly 300,000 votes. But disputed returns from Louisiana, South Carolina, Florida, and Oregon, whose total electoral vote was 20, threw the election in doubt. Tilden had undisputed claim to 184 electoral votes, only one short of a majority. But Hayes could still win if he managed to receive all 20 disputed votes.
The Constitution had established no method to determine the validity of disputed returns. It was clear that the decision lay with Congress, but it was not clear with which house or through what method. (The Senate was Republican, the House, Democratic.) Members of each party naturally supported a solution that would yield them the victory.
Finally, late in January 1877, Congress tried to break the deadlock by creating a special electoral commission to judge the disputed votes. The commission would be composed of five senators, five representatives, and five justices of the Supreme Court. The congressional delega-
tion would consist of five Republicans and five Democrats. The Court delegation would include two Republicans, two Democrats, and an independent. But the independent seat ultimately went to a justice whose real sympathies were with the Republicans. The commission voted along straight
Special
Electoral
Commission

Candidate (Party)	Electoral Vote	Popular Vote (%)
Rutherford B. Hayes	185	4,036,298
(Republican)		(48)
Samuel J. Tilden	184	4,300,590
(Democratic)		(51)
Nonvoting territories		
81.8% of electorate voting
THE ELECTION OF 1876
The election of 1876 was one of the most controversial in American history. As in the elections of 1824,1888, and 2000, the winner of the popular vote—Samuel J. Tilden-was not the winner of the electoral college, which he lost by one vote. The final decision as to who would be president was not made untd the day before the official inauguration in March. How did the Republicans turn this apparent defeat into a victory?
DEBATING THE PAST
Reconstruction
T1 T? T> A
m T? °ver the nature of Reconstruction has created so much controversy over U D JTL I JlI the decades that one scholar, writing in 1959, described the issue as a "dark and bloody ground." For many years, a relatively uniform and highly critical view of Reconstruction prevailed among historians. William A. Dunning offered the principal scholarly expression of this view in Reconstruction, Political and Economic (1907), the first major historical interpretation of Reconstruction. Dunning portrayed Reconstruction as a corrupt outrage perpetrated on the prostrate South by a vicious and vindictive group of Northern Republican Radicals. Unscrupulous carpetbaggers flooded the South to profit from the misery of the defeated region, Ignorant, illiterate blacks were thrust into positions of power for which they were entirely unfit. The Reconstruction experiment survived only because of the determination of the Republican Party to keep itself in power. Some later writers, notably Howard K. Beale, added an economic motive—to protect Northern business interests. Dunning's interpretation shaped the views of several generations of historians and helped shape popular depictions of Reconstruction such as those expressed in the 1915 film The Birth of a Nation and then the 1936 book and 1939 movie Gone with the Wind.
The great African American scholar W. E. B. Du Bois was among the first to challenge the Dunning view. In Black Reconstruction (1935), Du Bois argued that Reconstruction politics in the Southern states had been an effort on the part of the masses, black and white, to create a more democratic society. The misdeeds of the Reconstruction governments, he claimed, had been greatly exaggerated, and their achievements overlooked. In the 1940s, the historians C. Vann Woodward, David Herbert Donald, Thomas B. Alexander, and others began to reexamine the Reconstruction governments in the South and to suggest that their records were not nearly as inaccurate and incomplete as most historians had previously assumed.
By the early 1960s, a new view of Reconstruction was emerging, The revisionist approach was summarized by John Hope Franklin in Reconstruction after the Civil War (1961) and Kenneth Stampp in The Era of Reconstruction (1965), who claimed that the postwar Republicans had been engaged in a genuine, if flawed, effort to solve the problem of race in the South by providing much-
needed protection to the freedmen. The Reconstruction governments, for all their faults, had been bold experiments in interracial politics. The congressional Radicals were not saints, but they had displayed a genuine concern for the rights of slaves. Andrew Johnson was not a martyred defender of the Constitution, but an inept, racist politician who resisted reasonable compromise and brought the government to a crisis. African Americans had played only a small part in Reconstruction governments and had generally acquitted themselves well. The Reconstruction regimes had, in fact, brought important progress to the South, establishing the region's first public school system and other important social changes. Corruption in the South had been no worse than corruption in the North at that time, What was tragic about Reconstruction, the revisionist view claimed, was not what it did to Southern whites but, rather, what it did not do for Southern blacks, By stopping short of the reforms necessary to ensure blacks genuine equality, Reconstruction had consigned them to more than a century of injustice and discrimination.
In later years, scholars began to question the revisionist view in an attempt to draw attention to the achievements of Reconstruction. Eric Foner, in Nothing but Freedom (1983) and Reconstruction: America's
party lines, 8 to 7, awarding every disputed vote to Hayes. Congress accepted their verdict on March 2. Two days later, Hayes was inaugurated.
Behind the resolution of the deadlock, however, lay a series of elaborate compromises among leaders of both parties. When a Democratic filibuster threatened to derail the commission’s report, Republican Senate leaders met secretly with Southern Democratic leaders to work out terms by which the Democrats would allow the election of Hayes. According to traditional accounts, Republicans and Southern Democrats met at Washington’s Wormley Hotel. In return for a Republican pledge that Hayes would withdraw the last federal troops from the South, thus permitting the overthrow of the last Republican governments there, the Southerners agreed to abandon the filibuster.
Actually, the story behind the "Compromise of 1877” is more complex. Hayes was already on record favoring withdrawal of the troops, so Republicans needed to offer more than that if they hoped for Democratic support. The real
Compromise agreement, the one that won over the Southern Democrats, was reached well before the Wormley meeting. As the price of their cooperation, the Southern Democrats (among them some former Whigs) exacted several pledges from the Republicans in addition to withdrawal of the troops: the appointment of at least one Southerner to the Hayes cabinet, control of federal patronage in their areas, generous internal improvements, and federal aid for the Texas and Pacific Railroad. Many powerful Southern Democrats supported industrializing their region. They believed Republican programs of federal support for business would aid the South more than the states’ rights pol-
icies of the Democrats.
In his inaugural address, Hayes announced that the Souths most pressing need was the restoration of "wise, honest, and peaceful local self-government”-a signal that he planned to withdraw federal troops and let white Democrats take over the state governments. That statement, and Hayes’s subsequent actions, supported the widespread charges that he was
416 .
THE FREEDMEN S BUREAU
For four years after the Civil War, the Freedmen’s Bureau served newly freed slaves, helping them to get housing, food, education, and other services. This image shows African American men and women waiting for rations, most of them old and sick. (© The Granger Collection, New York) have both argued that the freed slaves displayed considerable independence in constructing their households on their own terms and asserting their control over family life, reproduction, and work. According to Jones in Labor of Love, Labor of Sorrow (1985), women in particular sought the opportunity "to labor on behalf of their own families and kin within the protected spheres of household and community."
Some historians have begun to argue that Reconstruction was not restricted to the South alone. Heather Richardson, in West from Appomattox (2007) and The Death of Reconstruction (2001), shows how the entire nation changed during the Civil War and Reconstruction—with the South, perhaps, changing least of all. The age of Reconstruction was also the age of western expansion and industrialization. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
Unfinished Revolution (1988), emphasized how far the former slaves moved toward freedom and independence in a short time and how large a role African Americans played in shaping Reconstruction. During Reconstruction, blacks won a certain amount of legal and political power in the South; even though they held that power only temporarily, they used it to strengthen their economic and social positions and to win a position of limited but genuine independence. Though they failed to achieve equality, they won a measure of individual and community autonomy that they used as building blocks of the freedom that emancipation alone had not guaranteed. Leon Litwack argued similarly in Been in the Storm So Long (1979) that former slaves used the relative latitude they enjoyed under Reconstruction to build a certain independence for themselves within Southern society. They strengthened their churches; they reunited their families; by refusing to work in the "gang-labor'' system of the plantations, they forced the creation of a new labor system in which they had more control over their own lives. Writing from the perspective of women's history, Amy Dru Stanley and Jacqueline Jones
1.	According to the essay, The Birth of a Nation and Gone with the Wind are popular depictions of Reconstruction that reflect Dunning's interpretation of the era. Can you find other popular depictions that reflect other interpretations of Reconstruction?
2.	A new view of Reconstruction began to emerge in the 1960s, the era of the civil rights movement. Why do you think the civil rights movement might have encouraged historians and others to reexamine Reconstruction?
3.	Which view of Reconstruction do you find more persuasive—the view of Reconstruction as a tragic era of exploitation of the South by the North or the view that sees Reconstruction as an era of achievement and progress?
paying off the South for acquiescing in his election and strengthened those who referred to him as "his Fraudulency.” Hayes tried to counter such charges by projecting an image of stern public (and private) rectitude. But the election had already created such bitterness that even Hayes's promise to serve only one term could not mollify his critics.
The president and his party had hoped to build up a "new Republican” organization in the South drawn from Whiggish conservative white groups and committed to some modest Republican acceptance of African American rights. But
FailureCin a11 such efforts failed- Although many the South white Southern leaders sympathized with
Republican economic policies, popular resentment of Reconstruction and its attack on white supremacy was so deep that supporting the party was politically Impossible. At the same time, the withdrawal of federal troops signaled, that the national government was giving up its attempts to control Southern politics and to improve the lot of African Americans in Southern society.
The Legacies of Reconstruction
Reconstruction made some important contributions to the efforts of former slaves to achieve dignity and equality in American life. And it was not as disastrous an experience for Southern whites as most of them believed at the time. But Reconstruction was in the end largely a failure, for in those years the United States abandoned its first serious effort to resolve the nation’s oldest and deepest social problem-the problem of race. Moreover, the experience so disappointed, disillusioned, and embittered white Americans that it would be nearly a century before they would try again in any serious way.
Why did this great assault on racial injustice not achieve
more? In part, it was because of the weaknesses and errors of
the people who directed it. But in greater Ideological	h h	,
Limits	part, ir was because attempts to produce
solutions ran up against conservative obstacles so deeply embedded in the nation s life that they could not be dislodged. Veneration of the Constitution
4‘
418
CHAPTER 15
THIS A REPUBLICAN FORM OF GOVERNMENT?”
The New York artist and cartoonist Thomas Nast marked the end of Reconstruction in 1876 with this biting cartoon in Harper's Weekly, expressing his dismay at what he considered the nation's betrayal of the former slaves, who still had not received adequate guarantees of their rights. The caption of the cartoon continued: "Is this protecting life, liberty, or property? Is this equal protection of the laws?" (The Library of Congress (LC-USZ62-116353}) sharply limited the willingness of national leaders to infringe on the rights of states and individuals. A profound respect for private property and free enterprise prevented any real assault on economic privilege in the South. Above all, perhaps, a pervasive belief among many of even the most liberal whites that African Americans were inherently inferior served as an obstacle to equality. Given the context within which Americans of the 1860s and 1870s were working, what is surprising is not that Reconstruction did so little, but that it did as much as it did.
Considering the odds confronting them, therefore, African Americans had reason for pride in the gains they made during Reconstruction. And future generations had reason for gratitude for two great charters of freedom-the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments to the Constitution-which, although largely ignored at the time, would one day serve as the basis for a "Second Reconstruction” that would renew the drive to bring freedom and equality to all Americans.
THE NEW SOUTH
The agreement between southern Democrats and northern Republicans that helped settle the disputed election of 1876 was supposed to be the first step toward developing a stable, permanent Republican Party in the South. In that respect, at
least, it failed. In the years following the end of Reconstruction, white southerners established the Democratic Party as the only viable political organization for the region’s whites. Even so, the South did change in the years after Reconstruction in some of the ways the framers of the Compromise of 1877 had hoped.
The "Redeemers"
By the end of 1877-after the last withdrawal of federal troops-every southern state government had been “redeemed” by white Democrats. Many white southerners rejoiced at the res-
Bourbon Rule toration of what they liked t0 cal1 "home rule.” But in reality, political power in the region was soon more restricted than at any time since the Civil War. Once again, the South fell under the control of a powerful, conservative oligarchy, whose members were known variously as the "Redeemers” (to themselves and their supporters) or the "Bourbons” (a term for aristocrats used by some of
their critics).
In a few places, this post-Reconstruction ruling class was much the same as the ruling class of the antebellum period. In Alabama, for example, the old planter elite-despite challenges from new merchant and industrial forces-retained much of its former power and continued largely to dominate the state for decades. In most areas, however, the Redeemers constituted a genuinely new ruling class. They were merchants, industrialists, railroad developers, and financiers. Some of them were former planters, some of them northern immigrants who had become absorbed into the region’s life, some of them ambitious, upwardly mobile white southerners from the region’s lower social tiers. They combined a commitment to "home rule” and social conservatism with a commitment to economic development.
The various Bourbon governments of the New South behaved similarly to one another. Conservatives had complained that the Reconstruction governments fostered widespread corruption, but the Redeemer regimes were even more awash in waste and fraud. (In this, they were little different from governments in every region of the country.) At the same time, virtually all the new Democratic regimes lowered taxes, reduced spending, and drastically diminished state services-including many of the most important accomplishments of Reconstruction. In one state after another, for example, state support for public school systems was reduced or eliminated. Schools are not a necessity,” an economy-conscious governor of Virginia commented.
By the late 1870s, significant dissenting groups were challenging the Bourbons: protesting the cuts in services and denouncing the commitment of the Redeemer governments to The	Paying off the prewar and Reconstruction
Readjuster	debts in full, at the original (usually high)
Challenge	rates of interest. In Virginia, for example 3
vigorous "Readjuster” movement emerged, demanding that the state revise its debt payment procedures so as to make more money available for state services. In 1879. the
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
• 419 Readjusters won control of the legislature, and in the next few years they captured the governorship and a U.S. Senate seat. Other states produced similar movements, some of them adding demands as well for greenbacks, debt relief, and other economic reforms. (A few such independent movements included significant numbers of African Americans in their ranks, but all consisted primarily of lower-income whites.) By the mid-1880s, however, conservative southerners-largely by exploiting racial prejudice-had destroyed most of the dissenting movements.
Industrialization and the "New South”
Some white southern leaders in the post-Reconstruction era hoped to see their region become the home of a vigorous industrial economy. The South had lost the war, such leaders
Henry Grady argued, because its economy had been unable to compete with the modernized manufacturing capacity of the North. Now the region must "out-Yankee the Yankees'’ and build a "New South.” Henry Grady, editor of the Atlanta Constitution, and other prominent spokesmen for a New South seldom challenged white supremacy, but they did advocate other important changes in southern values. Above all, they promoted the virtues of thrift, industry, and progress-qualities that prewar southerners had often denounced in northern society. "We have sown towns and cities in the place of theories,” Grady boasted to a New England audience in the 1880s, "and put business above politics. ... We have fallen in love with work.” But even the most fervent advocates of the New South creed were generally unwilling to break entirely with the southern past. That was evident in, among other things, the popular literature of the region. At the same time that white southern writers were extolling the virtues of industrialization in newspaper editorials and speeches, they were painting nostalgic portraits of the Old South in their literature. Few southerners advocated a literal return to the old ways, but most whites eagerly embraced romantic talk of the "Lost Cause.” And they responded warmly to the local-color fiction of such writers as Joel Chandler Harris, whose folktales-the most famous being Uncle Remus (1880)-portrayed the slave society of the antebellum years as a harmonious world marked by engaging dialect and close emotional bonds between the races. The writer Thomas Nelson Page similarly extolled the old Virginia aristocracy. The growing popularity of minstrel shows also reflected the romanticization of the Old South (see "Patterns of Popular Culture,” pp. 420-421). The white leaders of the New South, in short, faced their future
with one foot still in the past.
Even so, southern industry expanded dramatically in the years after Reconstruction and became a more important part of the region’s economy than ever before. Most visible was the growth in textile manufacturing, which increased ninefold in the last twenty years of the century. In the past, southern planters had usually shipped their cotton out of the region to manufacturers in the North or in Europe. Now textile factories appeared in the South itself-many of them drawn to the South from New England by the abundance of water power, the
ready supply of cheap labor, the low taxes, and the accommodating conservative governments. The tobacco-processing industry, similarly, established an important foothold in the region, largely through the work of James B. Duke of North Carolina, whose American Tobacco Company established for a time a virtual monopoly over the processing of raw tobacco into marketable materials. In the lower South, particularly in Birmingham, Alabama, the iron (and, later, steel) industry grew rapidly. By 1890, the southern iron and steel industry represented nearly a fifth of the nation’s total capacity.
Railroad development increased substantially in the post-Reconstruction years-at a rate far greater than that of the nation at large. Between 1880 and 1890, trackage in the South
Railroad m°re than doubled. And the South took a Development major step toward integrating its transportation system with that of the rest of the country when, in 1886, it changed the gauge (distance between the two rails) of its trackage to correspond with the standards of the North. Yet southern industry developed within strict limits, and its effects on the region were never even remotely comparable to the effects of industrialization on the North. The southern share of national manufacturing doubled in the last twenty years of the century, to 10 percent of the total. But that percentage was the same the South had claimed in 1860; the region, in other words, had done no more than regain what it had lost during the war and its aftermath. The region’s per capita income increased 21 percent in the same period. But at the end of the century, average income in the South was only 40 percent of that in the North; in 1860 it had been more than 60 percent. And even in those areas where development had been most rapid-textiles, iron, railroads—much of the capital had come from the North. In effect,
the South was developing a colonial economy.
The growth of industry in the South required the region to recruit a substantial industrial workforce for the first time. From the beginning, a high percentage of the factory workers (and an especially high percentage of textile workers) were women. Heavy male casualties in the Civil War had helped create a large population of unmarried women who were in dire need of employment. Factories also hired entire families, many of whom were moving into towns from failed farms. Workdays were long (often twelve hours a day) and wages were far below the northern equivalent; indeed, one of the greatest attractions of the South to industrialists was that employers were able to pay workers there as little as one-half what northern workers received.
Life in most mill towns was rigidly controlled by the owners and managers of the factories, who rigorously suppressed attempts at protest or union organization. Company stores sold goods to workers at inflated prices and issued credit at exorbitant rates (much like country stores in agrarian areas), and mill owners ensured that no competitors were able to establish themselves in the community. At the same time, however, the conditions of the mill town helped create a strong sense of community and solidarity among workers (even if they seldom translated such feelings into militancy).
The Minstrel Show
/fe;	minstrel show was one of the most popular forms of entertainment in America in the
? ,7 * ^7 second half of the nineteenth century. It was also a testament to the high awareness of race (and the high level of racism) in American society both before and after the Civil War. Minstrel performers were mostly white, usually disguised as black. But African American performers also formed
MINSTRELSY AT HIGH TIDE
The Primrose & West minstrel troupe—a lavish and expensive entertainment that drew large crowds in the 1800s—was one of many companies to offer this brand of entertainment to eager audiences all over the country. Although minstrelsy began with white musicians performing in blackface, the popularity of real African American minstrels encouraged the impresarios of the troupe to include groups of white and black performers alike. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZ62-2659)) their own minstrel shows end trensformed them into vehicles for training black entertainers and developing new forms of music and dance.
Before and during the Civil War, when minstrel shows consisted almost entirely of white performers, performers blackened their faces with cork and presented grotesque stereotypes of the slave culture of the American South, Among the most popular of the stumbling, ridiculously ignorant characters invented for these shows were such figures as "Zip Coon" and "Jim Crow" (whose name later resurfaced as a label for late-nineteenth-century segregation laws). A typical minstrel show presented a group of seventeen or more men seated in a semicircle facing the audience. The man in the center ran the show, played the straight man for the jokes of others, and led the music-lively dances and sentimental ballads played on banjos, castanets, and other instruments and sung by soloists or the entire group.
After the Civil War, white minstrels began to expand their repertoire. Drawing from the famous and successful freak shows of P. T. Barnum and other entertainment entrepreneurs, some began to include Siamese twins, bearded ladies, and even a supposedly 8-foot 2-inch "Chinese giant" in their shows. They also incorporated sex, both by including women in some shows and, even more popularly, by recruiting female impersonators, One of the most successful minstrel performers of the 1870s was Francis Leon, who delighted crowds with his female portrayal of a flamboyant "prima donna."
One reason white minstrels began to move in these new directions was that they were now facing competition from black performers, who could provide more-authentic versions of black music, dance, and humor.
Some industries, textiles for example, offered virtually no opportunities to African American workers. Others-including tobacco, iron, and lumber-did provide some employment for blacks, usually the most menial and lowest-paid positions. Some mill towns, therefore, were places where black and white culture came into close contact. That proximity contributed less to the growth of racial harmony than to the determination of white leaders to take additional measures to protect white supremacy.
At times, industrialization proceeded on the basis of no wage-paying employment. Through the "convict-lease” system, southern states leased gangs of convicted criminals to private
"Convict- interests as a cheap labor supply. The sys-Lease” System tem exposed the convicts to brutal and at times fatal mistreatment. It paid them nothing (the leasing fees went to the states, not the workers).
And it denied employment in railroad construction and other projects to the free labor force.
Tenants and Sharecroppers
Despite significant growth in southern industry, the region remained primarily agrarian. The most important economic reality in the post-Reconstruction South, therefore, was the impoverished state of agriculture. The 1870s and 1880s saw an acceleration of the trends that had begun in the immediate postwar years: the imposition of systems of tenantry and debt peonage on much of the region; the reliance on a few cash crops rather than on a diversified agricultural system; and in-creasing absentee ownership of valuable farmlands (many of them purchased by merchants and industrialists who paid little
10 *
AG FIELD MINSTRELS
This famous minstrel group stands in front of a huge promotional poster sometime in the late 1890s. (© Archive Photos/Getty Images) But interest in the minstrel show did not die altogether. In 1927, Hollywood released The Jazz Singer, the first feature film with sound. It was about the career of a white minstrel performer, and its star was one of the most popular singers of the twentieth century: Al Jolson, whose career had begun on the blackface minstrel circuit years before. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
They usually brought more talent to the task than white performers. The Georgia Minstrels, organized in 1865, was one of the first all-black minstrel troupes, and it had great success in attracting white audiences in the Northeast for several years. By the 1870s, touring African American minstrel groups were numerous. The black minstrels used many of the conventions of the white shows. There were dances, music, comic routines, and sentimental recitations. Some black performers even chalked their faces to make themselves look as dark as the white blackface performers with whom they were competing. Black minstrels sometimes denounced slavery (at least indirectly) and did not often speak demeaningly of the capacities of their race. But they could not entirely escape caricaturing African American life as they struggled to meet the expectations of their white audiences.
The black minstrel shows had few openly political aims. They did help develop some important forms of African American entertainment and transform them into a part of the national culture. Black minstrels introduced new forms of dance, derived from the informal traditions of slavery and black community life. They showed the "buck and wing," the "stop time," and the "Virginia essence," which established the foundations for the tap and jazz dancing of the early twentieth century. They also improvised musically and began experimenting with forms that over time contributed to the growth of ragtime, jazz, and rhythm and blues.
Eventually, black minstrelsy—like its white counterpart—evolved into other forms of theater, including the beginnings of serious black drama. At Ambrose Park in Brooklyn in the 1890s, for example, the celebrated black comedian Sam Lucas (a veteran of the minstrel circuit) starred in the play Darkest America, which one black newspaper later described as a "delineation of Negro life, carrying the race through all their historical phases from the plantation, into reconstruction days and finally painting our people as they are today, cultured and accomplished in the social graces, [holding] the mirror faithfully up to nature."
1.	How did minstrel shows performed by white minstrels reinforce prevailing attitudes toward African Americans?
2.	Minstrel shows performed by black minstrels often conformed to existing stereotypes of African Americans. Why?
3.	Can you think of any popular entertainments today that carry remnants of the minstrel shows of the nineteenth century?
attention to whether the land was being properly used). During Reconstruction, perhaps a third or more of the farmers in the South were tenants; by 1900, the figure had increased to 70 percent. That was in large part the result of the crop-lien system, the system by which farmers borrowed money against their future crops and often fell deeper and deeper into debt.
Tenantry took several forms. Farmers who owned tools, equipment, and farm animalsor who had the money to buy them-usually paid an annual cash rent for their land. But many farmers (including most black ones) had no money or equipment. Landlords would supply them with land, a crude house, a few tools, seed, and sometimes a mule. In return, farmers Would promise the landlord a large share of the annual crop-hence the term "sharecropping.” After paying their landlords
and their local merchants (who were often the same people), sharecroppers seldom had anything left to sell on their own.
African Americans and the New South
The "New South creed” was not the property of whites alone. Many African Americans were attracted to the vision of progress and self-improvement as well. Some blacks succeeded in elevating themselves into a distinct middle class-most of them economically inferior to the white middle class, but nevertheless significant. These were former slaves (and, as the decades passed, their offspring) who managed to
BLACClassDDLE ac<Tuire ProPertY build sma11 businesses, or enter professions. A few African Americans accumulated substantial fortunes by establishing banks and
*	421
422 ® CHAPTER 15
FAMILY PORTRAIT
This photograph of an African American family of four generations was taken in the late nineteenth century. Every member of this family was born on the plantation of J. J. Smith of Beaufort, South Carolina. The youngest members, while certainly touched by slavery, were not born into that institution. (© Corbis) insurance companies to serve the black community. One of those was Maggie Lena, a black woman who became the first female bank president in the United States when she founded the St. Luke Penny Savings Bank in Richmond in 1903. Most middle-class blacks experienced more-modest gains by becoming doctors, lawyers, nurses, or teachers serving African American communities.
A cardinal tenet of this rising group of African Americans was that education was vital to the future of their race. With the support of northern missionary societies and, to a far lesser extent, a few southern state governments, they expanded the network of black colleges and institutes that had taken root during Reconstruction into an important educational system.
The chief spokesman for this commitment to education, and
Booker T. for a time tlae maior spokesman for African Washington Americans in the South (and beyond), was Booker T. Washington, founder and president of the Tuskegee Institute in Alabama. Born into slavery, Washington had worked his way out of poverty after acquiring an education (at Virginia’s famous Hampton Institute). He urged
other blacks to follow the same road to self-improvement.
Washington’s message was both cautious and hopeful. African Americans should attend school, learn skills, and establish a solid footing in agriculture and the trades. Industrial, not
classical, education should be their goal. They should, moreover, refine their speech, improve their dress, and adopt habits of thrift and personal cleanliness; they should, in short, adopt the standards of the white middle class. Only thus, he claimed, could they win the respect of the white population, the prerequisite for any larger social gains. African Americans should forgo agitating for political rights, he said, and concentrate on self-improvement and preparation for equality. In a famous speech
The Atlanta in Geor&ia in 1895, Washington outlined a Compromise philosophy of race relations that became widely known as the Atlanta Compromise.
'The wisest among my race understand,” he said, "that the agitation of questions of social equality is the extremest folly.” Rather, blacks should engage in "severe and constant struggle” for economic gains; for, as he explained, "no race that has anything to contribute to the markets of the world is long in any degree ostracized.” If African Americans were ever to win the rights and privileges of citizenship, they must first show that they were "prepared for the exercise of these privileges.” Washington offered a powerful challenge to those whites who wanted to discourage African Americans from acquiring an education or winning any economic gains. He helped awaken the interest of a new generation to the possibilities for selfadvancement through self-improvement. But his message was also an implicit promise that African Americans would not overtly challenge the system of segregation that whites were then in the process of erecting.
The Birth of Jim Crow
Few white southerners had ever accepted the idea of racial equality. That the former slaves acquired any legal and political rights at all after emancipation was in large part the result of federal support. That support all but vanished after 1877. Federal troops withdrew. Congress lost interest. And the Supreme Court effectively stripped the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments of much of their significance. In the so-called civil rights cases of 1883, the Court ruled that the Fourteenth Amendment prohibited state governments from discriminating against people because of race but did not restrict private organizations or individuals from doing so. Thus railroads, hotels, theaters, and workplaces could legally practice segregation.
Eventually, the Court also validated state legislation that institutionalized the separation of the races. In Plessy v. Ferguson (1896), a case involving a Louisiana law that required separate
Plessy v	seating arrangements for the races on rail-
Ferguson	roads, the Court held that separate accom-
modations did not deprive blacks of equal rights if the accommodations were equal, a decision that survived for years as part of the legal basis for segregated schools. In Cumming v. County Board of Education (1899), the Court ruled that laws establishing separate schools for whites were valid even if there were no comparable schools for African Americans.
Before these decisions, white southerners were working to strengthen white supremacy and to separate the races to the greatest extent possible. One illustration of this movement
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH - 423
THE CROP-LIEN SYSTEM IN 1880
In the years after the Civil War, more and more southern farmers—white and black—became tenants or sharecroppers on land owned by others. This map shows the percentage of farms that were within the so-called crop-lien system, the system by which people worked their lands for someone else, who had a claim (or "lien") on a part of the farmers' crops. Note the high density of sharecropping and tenant farming in the most fertile areas of the Deep South, the same areas where slaveholding had been most dominant before the Civil War. How did the crop-lien system contribute to the shift in southern agriculture toward one-crop farming?
from subordination to segregation was black voting rights. In some states, disenfranchisement had begun almost as soon as Reconstruction ended. But in other areas, black voting continued for some time after Reconstruction-largely because conservative whites believed they could control the black electorate and use it to beat back the attempts of poor white farmers to take control of the Democratic Party. In the 1890s, however, franchise restrictions became much more rigid. During those years, some small white farmers began to demand complete black disenfranchisement-both because of ra-eial prejudice and because they objected to the black vote being used against them by the conservative planters (known as "Bourbons”, see p. 418). At the same time, many members of the conservative elite began to fear that poor whites might unite politically with poor African Americans to challenge them. They too began to support further franchise restrictions.
In devising laws to disenfranchise black males, the southern states had to find ways to evade the Fifteenth Amendment, which prohibited states from denying anyone the right to vote because of race. Two devices emerged before 1900 to accomplish this goal. One was the poll tax or some form of property
Restricting qualification; few African Americans were the Franchise prosperous enough to meet such requirements. Another was the "literacy” or "understanding” test, which required voters to demonstrate an ability to read and interpret the Constitution. Even those African Americans who could read had trouble passing the difficult test white officials gave them. Such restrictions were often applied unequally. Literacy tests for whites, for example, were sometimes much easier than those for blacks. Even so, the laws affected poor white voters as well as African Americans. By the late 1890s, the black vote had decreased by 62 percent, the white vote by 26 percent. One result was that some states passed so-called grandfather laws, permitting men who could not meet the literacy and property qualifications to be enfranchised if their ancestors had voted before Reconstruction began, thus barring the descendants of slaves from the polls while allowing poor whites access to them. In many areas, however, ruling elites were quite content to see poor whites, a potential
source of opposition to their power, barred from voting.
The Supreme Court proved as compliant in ruling on the disenfranchising laws as it was in dealing with the civil rights
424 . CHAPTER 15
TUSKEGEE INSTITUTE, 1881
From these modest beginnings, Booker T. Washington's Tuskegee Institute in Alabama became the preeminent academy offering technical and industrial training to black men. It deliberately de-emphasized the traditional liberal arts curricula of most colleges. Washington considered such training an unnecessary frill and encouraged his students to work o developing practical skills. (© Corbis) cases. The Court eventually voided the grandfather laws, but it validated the literacy test (in the 1898 case of Williams v. Mississippi) and displayed a general willingness to let the southern states define their own suffrage standards as long as evasions of the Fifteenth Amendment were not too glaring.
Laws restricting the franchise and segregating schools were only part of a network of state statutes-known as the Jim Crow laws-that by the first years of the twentieth century had institutionalized an elaborate system of segregation reaching into almost every area of southern life. Blacks and whites could not ride in the same railroad cars, sit in the same waiting rooms, use the same washrooms, eat in the same restaurants, or
White	sit in same t^ieaters- Blacks had no ac-
Control cess t0 manY public parks, beaches, and Perpetuated picnic areas; they could not be patients in many hospitals. Much of the new legal structure did no more than confirm what had already been widespread social practice in the South since well before the end of Reconstruction. But the Jim Crow laws also stripped African Americans of many of the modest social, economic,
and political gains they had made in the more fluid atmosphere of the late nineteenth century. The laws served, too, as a means for whites to retain control of social relations between the races in the newly growing cities and towns of the South, where traditional patterns of deference and subjugation were more difficult to preserve than in the countryside. What had been maintained by custom in the rural South was to be maintained by law in the urbanizing South.
More than legal efforts were involved in this process. The 1890s witnessed a dramatic increase in white violence against blacks, which, along with the Jim Crow laws, served to inhibit black agitation for equal rights. The worst such violence-lynching of blacks by white mobs, either because the victims were accused of crimes or because they had seemed somehow to violate their expected station-reached appalling levels. In the nation as a whole in the 1890s, there was an average of 187 lynchings each year, more than 80 percent of them in the South. The vast
Lynchings majority of victims were black. One African
„ ............... American woman, Lucy McMillan, said,
John Hunter's wife came to my house on Saturday morning, and
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
■ 425 A LYNCH MOB, 1893 A
large, almost festive crowd gathers to watch the lynching of a black man accused of the murder of a three-year-o d white girl. Lynch,ngs remained frequent ,n the South un.il as late as the 1930s, but they reached their peak in the 1890s and the firs, years of the twentieth century. Lynchings such as this one-pubhshed well ,n advance and attracting whole families who traveled great distances to see them-were infrequent. Most lynchings were the work of smaller groups, operating with less visibility. (The Library of Congress) told they were going to whip me. I was afraid of them. There was so much talk of Ku-Klux drowning people, and killing them.
The most celebrated lynchings occurred in cities and towns, where large, well-organized mobs -occasionally with the tacit cooperation of local authorities-seized black prisoners from the jails and hanged them in great public rituals. Such public lynch tags were often planned well in advance and elaborately orga nized. They attracted large audiences from surrounding regions. Entire families traveled many miles to witness the spectacles. But such great public lynchings were relatively rare. Muc more frequent, and more dangerous to African Americans because less visible or predictable, were lynchings performe by small vigilante mobs, often composed of friends or relative of the victim (or supposed victim) of a crime. Those invo ve lynchings often saw their actions as a legitimate
enforcement; and indeed, some victims of lynchings a in ac committed crimes. But lynchings were also a means y w ic whites controlled the black population through terror an intimidation. Thus, some lynch mobs killed African Arne whose only ’'crime” had been presumptuousness, chose as victims outsiders in the community, w ose p
threatened to disturb the normal pattern of race relations. Black men who had made any sexual advances toward white women (or who white men thought had done so) were particularly vulnerable to lynchings; the fear of black sexuality, and the unspoken fear among many men that white women might be attracted to that sexuality, was always an important part of the belief system that supported segregation. Whatever the reasons or circumstances, the victims of lynch mobs were denied the protection of the laws and the opportunity to prove their innocence.
The rise of lynchings shocked the conscience of many white Americans in a way that other forms of racial injustice did not. Almost from the start there was a substantial anti-lynching movement. In 1892 Ida B. Wells, a committed black journalist, launched what became an international anti-lynching movement with a series of impassioned articles after the lynching of three of her friends in Memphis, Tennessee, her home. The movement gradually gathered strength in the first years of the twentieth century, attracting substantial support from whites (particularly white women) in both the North and the South. Its goal was a federal anti-lynching law, which would allow the national government to do what
HOW WE REMEMBER THE PAST
can tell us a great deal about REMEMBERING BLACK HISTORY our vajues and priorities as a nation. When these memories take official form, as in a public monument erected in a culturally significant setting, they offer a view into how Americans understood history in a particular time. What is revealed, however, is rarely a popular consensus about what individuals or events were worthy of being celebrated. Rather, the final construction and placement of any public monument typically reflects a series of tough debates between people with different views of the meaning of the past. The two monuments pictured on the following page are among the most famous in American history in general and African American history in particular. The first is a bronze relief by Augustus Saint-Gaudens commemorating the Fifty-Fourth Massachusetts Volunteer Infantry Regiment, the first military unit composed of black soldiers raised in the North during the Civil War. At full fighting strength, with over 1000 African American men led by an all-white officer corps, the 54th became a national symbol of African American freedom. Leading the assault on July 18, 1863, against the Confederate stronghold, Fort Wagner, on Morris Island, South Carolina, it sustained heavy losses, including that of its commanding officer, Colonel Robert Shaw. Despite failing to take the fort, the black troops fought passionately and with discipline, thereby silencing critics who doubted the very ability of African Americans to stand strong in battle.
Saint-Gaudens unveiled his memorial in May 1897. Eleven feet high and 14 feet long, it depicts the 54th marching through Boston in the first leg of its journey to the battle-front. Leading the unit is Colonel Shaw, on horseback. It still sits in its original locale, at the edge of the Boston Common in the shadow of the Massachusetts State House.
The second monument is a white granite statue by Lie Yixin, a sculptor from the People s Republic of China, honoring the life of civil rights pioneer, Martin Luther King, Jr. King, a Baptist minister born in Atlanta, Georgia, who led the fight to end segregation in the South in the 1950s and 1960s. He spearheaded the drive to pass the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and the Voting Rights Act of 1965. He was assassinated in 1968.
The King statue is actually part of a larger, four-acre park dedicated to his life that sits in the southwest corner of the National Mall in Washington, D.C. The 30-foot high statue has a clear view of the Lincoln Memorial and the Jefferson Memorial and is accompanied by a 450-foot long inscription wall that bears quotes from King’s most famous speeches. The King Memorial is the first dedicated to a black American on the National Mall.
MEMORIALIZING BLACK HISTORY IN 1897
Memorial to Robert Gould Shaw and the Fifty-Fourth Regiment. ( Egg Images/Alamy)
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What does the monument tell us about the public role of black history in the late 19th century?
2.	How do you interpret the relationship between the black foot soldiers and the white officer on the horse?
3.	What does the memorial suggest about liberty and progress for African Americans?
MEMORIALIZING BLACK HISTORY IN 2011
The Martin Luther King, Jr. National Memorial. " Evan Golub Demotix Corbis
MAKE CONNECTIONS
1.	How would you describe the memory of black history in this monument?
2.	What is the relationship between King and the surrounding environment?
3.	What connections can you draw between how the public remembered black history in the late nineteenth century and the early twenty-first century?
427
428 * CHAPTER 15
state and local governments in the South were generally unwilling to do: punish those responsible for lynchings.
But the substantial white opposition to lynchings stood as an exception to the general white support for suppression of African Americans. Indeed, just as in the antebellum period, the shared commitment to white supremacy helped dilute class
LOOKING BACK
Reconstruction, long remembered by many white Americans as a vindictive outrage or a tragic failure, was in fact a profoundly important moment in American history. Despite the bitter political battles in Washington, D.C., and throughout the South, culminating in the unsuccessful effort to impeach President Andrew Johnson, the most important result of the effort to reunite the nation after its long and bloody war was a reshaping of the lives of ordinary people in all regions of the nation.
In the North, Reconstruction solidified the power of the Republican Party and ensured that public policy would support the continued growth of an advanced industrial economy. The rapid growth of the northern economy continued and accelerated, drawing more and more of its residents into an expanding commercial world.
In the South, Reconstruction did more than simply bring slavery to an end. It fundamentally rearranged the relationship between the region's white and black citizens. Only for a while did Reconstruction permit African Americans to participate actively and effectively in southern politics. After a few years of widespread black voting and significant black officeholding, the forces of white supremacy forced most African Americans to the margins of the southern political world, where they would mostly remain until the 1960s.
But in other ways, the lives of southern blacks changed dramatically. Overwhelmingly, they left the plantations. Some sought work in towns and cities. Some left the region altogether.
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
Andrew Johnson 404 Atlanta Compromise 422 Black Codes 405 Booker T. Washington 422 Carpetbaggers 408 Charles Sumner 403 Compromise of 1877 415 Crop-lien system 410
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What were the principal questions facing the nation at the end of the Civil War?
2.	What were the achievements of Reconstruction? Where did it fail and why?
3.	What new problems arose in the South as the North's interest in Reconstruction waned?
Enforcement Acts 414 Fourteenth Amendment 405 Freedmen’s Bureau 402 Hamilton Fish 412 Ida B. Wells 425 Jim Crow laws 422 Ku Klux Klan 414 Panic of 1873 413
White Unity animosities between poorer whites and the Bourbon oligarchies. Economic issues tended to play a secondary role to race in southern politics, distracting people from the glaring social inequalities that afflicted blacks and whites alike. The commitment to white supremacy, in
short, was a burden for poor whites as well as for blacks.
But the great majority began farming on small farms of their own-not as landowners, except in rare cases, but as tenants and sharecroppers on land owned mostly by whites. The result was a form of economic bondage, driven by debt, only scarcely less oppressive than the legal bondage of slavery. But within this system, African Americans managed to carve out a much larger sphere of social and cultural autonomy than they had ever been able to create under slavery. Black churches organized in great numbers. African American schools emerged in some communities, and black colleges began to appear in the region. Some former slaves owned businesses and flourished. In southern cities and towns, a fledgling black middle class began to emerge.
The system of tenantry, which emerged in the course of Reconstruction, continued after its end to dominate the southern economy. Strenuous efforts by "New South” advocates to advance industry and commerce in the region produced significant results in a few areas. But the South on the whole remained what it had always been, an overwhelmingly rural society with a sharply defined class structure. It was also a region with a deep commitment among its white citizens to the subordination of African Americans-a commitment solidified in the 1890s and the early twentieth century when white southerners erected an elaborate legal system of segregation (the "Jim Crow” laws). The promise of the great Reconstruction amendments to the Constitution-the Fourteenth and Fifteenth-remained largely unfulfilled in the South as the century drew to its close.
Plessy v. Ferguson 422 Radical Republicans 403 Redeemers 418 Scalawags 407 Sharecropping 410 Thaddeus Stevens 403 Wade-Davis Bill 403 William H. Seward 413
4.	What was the Compromise of 1877, and how did it affect Reconstruction?
5.	How did the New South differ from the South before the Civil War?
RECONSTRUCTION AND THE NEW SOUTH
• 429 SIGNIFICANT events
1863
Lincoln announces preliminary Reconstruction plan
1865 e
Black Codes enacted in South Freedmen's Bureau established
Congress creates Joint Committee on Reconstruction •
Lincoln assassinated (April 14); Andrew Johnson becomes
president
1864
Wade-Davis Bill passed
1869
Congress passes Fifteenth Amendment
1873
Commercial and financial panic disrupts economy
1872
Grant reelected president
1866
Congress approves Fourteenth Amendment; most Southern states reject it
Ku Klux Kian formed in South
1877
1875
"Whiskey ring" scandal discredits Grant administration
1867
Southern states establish
Reconstruction governments under congressional plan
United States purchases Alaska
Military Reconstruction Act (and two supplementary acts) outlines congressional plan of
Reconstruction
Tenure of Office Act and
Command of the Army Act restrict presidential power
1868
Andrew Johnson impeached but not convicted
Fourteenth Amendment ratified Ulysses S. Grant elected president
Rutherford B. Hayes elected president after disputed election
Last federal troops withdrawn from ® South after Compromise of 1877
1895	A
Booker T. Washington outlines Atlanta Compromise
1890s
"Jim Crow" laws passed throughout South Lynchings increase in South
1896
Plessy v. Ferguson upholds "separate but equal" racial facilities
THE CONQUEST OF THE FAR WEST
LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What various ethnic and racial groups populated the American West, and how were the cultural characteristics of these groups reflected in the West?
2.	How did the arrival and settlement of substantial numbers of Anglo-Americans transform the society and economy of the West?
3.	What role did the federal government play in shaping the development of the West?
AMERICAN PROGRESS, 1872
The Brooklyn artist John Gast painted this tribute to westward expansion—an image of hardy pioneers marching toward the frontier, protected by the goddess of progress. It was designed for travel guides to encourage tourists and migrants to travel to the West. (The Library of Congress (LCTJSZC4-668))
SETTING THE STAGE
BY THE MID-1840S, MIGRANTS FROM THE EASTERN REGIONS
of the United States had settled in the West in substantial numbers. Farmers, ranchers, and miners all found opportunity in the western lands. By the end of the Civil War, the West had already become legendary in the eastern states. It no longer seemed to be the Great American Desert, an image popularized by early travelers in the West; it was now the frontier : an empty land awaiting settlement and civilization, a place of wealth, adventure, opportunity, and untrammeled individualism. In fact, the real West of the mid-nineteenth century bore little resemblance to either of these images. It was a diverse land, with many different regions and different climates, and an extensively populated land, with a number Myth and	we^"^eve'°Pe^ societies and cultures. Indians, Mexicans, French and British Canadians,
Reality Asians, and others had been living in the West for generations. The Anglo-American settlers helped create new civilizations in this vast and complicated land, but they seldom did so by themselves. Although they tried, with considerable success, to conquer and disperse many of the peoples already living in the region, they were never able to make the West theirs alone. They interacted in countless ways with the existing population. Almost everything the Anglo-Americans did and built reflected the
influence of these other cultures.
Most of all, however, English-speaking Americans transformed the West by making it part of the growing capitalist economy of the East. And despite their self-image as rugged individualists, they relied heavily on assistance from the federal government—land grants, subsidies, and military protection—as they developed the region.
THE SOCIETIES OF THE FAR WEST
The Far West (or what many nineteenth-century Americans called the "Great West”)the region beyond the Mississippi River into which millions of Anglo-Americans moved in the years after the Civil War-was in fact many lands. It contained some of the most arid territory in the United States, and some of the wettest and lushest. It contained the flattest plains and the highest mountains. It contained vast treeless prairies and deserts and great forests. And it contained many peoples.
The Western Tribes
The largest and most important western population group before the great Anglo-American migration was the Indian tribes. Some were members of eastern tribes-Cherokee, Creek, and others-who had been forcibly resettled west of the Mississippi to "Indian Territory” (later Oklahoma) and elsewhere before the Civil War. But most were members of tribes that had always lived in the West.
The western tribes had developed several forms of civilization. More than 300,000 Indians (among them the Serrano, Chumash, Porno, Maidu, Yurok, and Chinook) had lived on the Pacific coast before the arrival of Spanish settlers. Disease and dislocation decimated the tribes, but in the mid-nineteenth century 150,000 remained—some living within the Hispanic society the Spanish and Mexican settlers had created, many still living within their own tribal communities. The Pueblos of the Southwest had long lived largely as farmers and had established permanent settle ments there even before the Spanish arrived in the seventeenth century. The Pueblos grew corn, they built towns and cities of adobe houses; they practiced elaborate forms of irrigation, and they participated in trade and commerce. In the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, their intimate relationship with the Spanish (later Mexicans) produced, in effect, an alliance against the Apaches, Navajos, and Comanches of the region.
The complex interaction between the Pueblos and the Spanish produced an elaborate caste system in the Southwest. At the top were the Spanish or Mexicans, who owned the largest estates and controlled the trading centers at Santa Fe and elsewhere. The Pueblos, subordinate but still
* 431

